Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB310.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Police officer" means every paid police officer, sheriff, or deputy sheriff,
corrections employee with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS
196.037, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional officer with the power
of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any jailer or deputy jailer, any
auxiliary police officer appointed pursuant to KRS 95.445, any police officer
of a public institution of postsecondary education appointed pursuant to KRS
164.950, any school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any
citation or safety officer appointed pursuant to KRS 83A.087 and 83A.088,
elected to office, or employed by any county, airport board created pursuant to
KRS Chapter 183, city, local board of education, or by the state;
(b) "Firefighter" means every paid firefighter or volunteer firefighter who is
employed by or volunteers his or her services to the state, airport board
created pursuant to KRS Chapter 183, any county, city, fire district, or any
other organized fire department recognized, pursuant to KRS 95A.262, as a
fire department operated and maintained on a nonprofit basis in the interest of
the health and safety of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth and shall
include qualified civilian firefighters employed at Kentucky-based military
installations; [and]
(c) "Emergency medical services personnel" means any paid or volunteer
emergency medical services personnel who is certified or licensed pursuant to
KRS Chapter 311A and who is employed directly by, or volunteering directly
for, any:
1. County;
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1642
2. City;
3. Fire protection district created under KRS 75.010 to 75.260; or
4. Emergency ambulance service district created under KRS 108.080 to
108.180;
to provide emergency medical services[.];
(d) "Public safety officer" means a police officer, firefighter, or emergency
medical services personnel;
(e) "Public safety officer in training" means an individual attending a formal
training academy that provides training, certification, or licensing for the
individual to serve as a public safety officer, provided the training academy
is:
1. Certified by the Commonwealth of Kentucky; or
2. Established by a local government or an agency thereof in Kentucky;
(f) "Retired public safety officer" means an individual who separated from
service in good standing as a public safety officer; and
(g) "Post-service act in the line of duty" means an attack on a retired public
safety officer following separation of service that is in retaliation for a line
of duty action taken by the retired public safety officer while still serving or
based upon the retired public safety officer's prior service as a public safety
officer.
(2) The spouse of any public safety officer, public safety officer in training[police
officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, corrections employee with the power of a peace
officer pursuant to KRS 196.037, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional
officer with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any jailer or
deputy jailer, any auxiliary police officer appointed pursuant to KRS 95.445, any
police officer of a public institution of postsecondary education appointed pursuant
to KRS 164.950, any school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1642
citation or safety officer appointed pursuant to KRS 83A.087 and 83A.088,
firefighter], or member of the Kentucky National Guard on state active duty
pursuant to KRS 38.030, or a member of a state National Guard or a Reserve
component on federal active duty under Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code
who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, whose death occurs[
on or after July 1, 2002,] as a direct result of an act in the line of duty, or the spouse
of any retired public safety officer whose death occurs as a direct result of a post-
service act in the line of duty, shall receive a lump-sum payment of eighty
thousand dollars ($80,000) if there are no surviving children, which sum shall be
paid by the State Treasurer from the general fund of the State Treasury. [The spouse
of any emergency medical services personnel whose death occurs on or after
November 1, 2015, as a direct result of an act in the line of duty shall receive a
lump-sum payment of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) if there are no surviving
children, which sum shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the general fund of
the State Treasury. ]If there are surviving children and a surviving spouse, the
payment shall be apportioned equally among the surviving children and the spouse.
If there is no surviving spouse, the payment shall be made to the surviving children,
eighteen (18) or more years of age. For surviving children less than eighteen (18)
years of age, the State Treasurer shall:
(a) Pay thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to the surviving children; and
(b) Hold forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) in trust divided into equal accounts
at appropriate interest rates for each surviving child until the child reaches the
age of eighteen (18) years.
If a child dies before reaching the age of eighteen (18) years, his or her account
shall be paid to his or her estate. If there are no surviving children, the payment
shall be made to any parents of the deceased.
(3) The Kentucky Fire Commission shall be authorized to promulgate administrative
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1642
regulations establishing criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of
this section as it pertains to both paid and volunteer firefighters, including but not
limited to defining when a firefighter has died in line of duty. Administrative
hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority of this
subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations
establishing criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this section
as it pertains to police officers, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional
officers with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any school
resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any jailers or deputy jailers,
including but not limited to defining when one has died in line of duty.
Administrative hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority
of this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(5) The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this
section as it pertains to correctional employees, including but not limited to
defining which employees qualify for coverage and which circumstances constitute
death in the line of duty.
(6) The Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services shall promulgate
administrative regulations establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the
administration of this section as it pertains to emergency medical services
personnel, including but not limited to which employees or volunteers qualify for
coverage and which circumstances constitute death in the line of duty.
(7) The Department of Military Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this
section as it pertains to National Guard or Reserve component members, including
but not limited to defining which National Guard or Reserve component members
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1642
qualify for coverage and which circumstances constitute death in the line of duty.
(8) The estate of anyone whose spouse or surviving children would be eligible for
benefits under subsection (2) of this section, and the estate of any regular member
of the United States Armed Forces who names Kentucky as home of record for
military purposes whose death occurs as a direct result of an act in the line of duty,
shall be exempt from all probate fees, including but not limited to those established
by the Supreme Court of Kentucky pursuant to KRS 23A.200 and 24A.170, or
imposed under KRS 24A.185, 64.012, and 172.180.
(9) The benefits payable under this section shall be in addition to any benefits now or
hereafter prescribed under any police, sheriff, firefighter's, volunteer firefighter's,
emergency medical services personnel, or National Guard or Reserve retirement or
benefit fund established by the federal government or by any state, county, or any
municipality.
(10) Any funds appropriated for the purpose of paying the death benefits described in
subsection (2) of this section shall be allotted to a self-insuring account. These
funds shall not be used for the purpose of purchasing insurance.
(11) (a) For the purposes of this section, if a firefighter dies as a result of cancer, the
death shall be a direct result of an act in the line of duty if the firefighter:
1. Was a firefighter for at least five (5) consecutive years;
2. Developed one (1) or more of the cancers listed in paragraph (b) of this
subsection which caused the firefighter's death within ten (10) years of
separation from service as a firefighter;
3. Did not use tobacco products for a period of ten (10) years prior to the
diagnosis of cancer;
4. Was under the age of sixty-five (65) at the time of death;
5. Was not diagnosed with any cancer prior to employment as a firefighter;
and
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1642
6. Was exposed while in the course of firefighting to a known carcinogen
as defined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer or the
National Toxicology Program, and the carcinogen is reasonably
associated with one (1) or more of the cancers listed in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(b) This section shall apply to the following cancers:
1. Bladder cancer;
2. Brain cancer;
3. Colon cancer;
4. Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma;
5. Kidney cancer;
6. Liver cancer;
7. Lymphatic or haematopoietic cancer;
8. Prostate cancer;
9. Testicular cancer;
10. Skin cancer;
11. Cervical cancer; and
12. Breast cancer.
(c) 1. The provisions of this subsection creating an entitlement to the line of
duty death benefits shall apply exclusively to this section and shall not
be interpreted or otherwise construed to create either an express or
implied presumption of work-relatedness for any type of claim filed
pursuant to KRS Chapter 342.
2. This paragraph is intended to provide clarification regarding the sole and
exclusive application of this subsection to only the benefits available
under this section and shall not be used as a bar or other type of
limitation to impair or alter the rights and ability of a claimant to prove
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1642
work-relatedness under KRS Chapter 342 or other laws.
Section 2. The amendments to Section 1 of this Act shall apply to line of duty
deaths occurring on or after the effective date of this Act, except that the amendments to
Section 1 of this Act pertaining to a:
(1) A retired public safety officer whose death occurs as a direct result of a post-
service act in the line of duty as defined in Section 1 of this Act shall be retroactive to
deaths occurring on or after August 1, 2012; and
(2) Public safety officer in training whose death occurs as a direct result of an act
in line of duty shall be retroactive to deaths occurring on or after November 1, 2024.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:18 AM Jacketed